California statutes. Civil Code
(B) A notary public who violates this section by failing to obtain the satisfactory evidence required by subparagraph (A) shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000). An action to impose this civil penalty may be brought by the Secretary of State in an administrative proceeding or a public prosecutor in superior court, and shall be enforced as a civil judgment. A public prosecutor shall
 inform the secretary of any civil penalty imposed under this subparagraph.

(2) The oath or affirmation under penalty of perjury of two credible witnesses, whose identities are proven to the officer upon the presentation of a document satisfying the requirements of paragraph (3) or (4), that each statement in paragraph (1) is true.

(3) Reasonable reliance on the presentation to the officer of any one of the following, if the document or other form of identification is current or has been issued within five years:

(A) An identification card or driver’s license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(B) A passport issued by the Department of State of the United States.

(C) An inmate
 identification card issued by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, if the inmate is in custody in prison.

(D) Any form of inmate identification issued by a sheriff’s department, if the inmate is in custody in a local detention facility.

(4) Reasonable reliance on the presentation of any one of the following, provided that a document specified in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, shall either be current or have been issued within five years and shall contain a photograph and description of the person named on it, shall be signed by the person, and shall bear a serial or other identifying number:

(A) A valid consular identification document issued by a consulate from the applicant’s country of citizenship, or a valid passport from the applicant’s country of citizenship.

(B) A driver’s license issued by a state other than California or by a Canadian or Mexican public agency authorized to issue driver’s licenses.

(C) An identification card issued by a state other than California.

(D) An identification card issued by any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(E) An employee identification card issued by an agency or office of the State of California, or by an agency or office of a city, county, or city and county in this state.

(F) An identification card issued by a federally recognized tribal government.

(c) An officer who has taken an acknowledgment pursuant to this section shall be
 presumed to have operated in accordance with the provisions of law.

(d) A party who files an action for damages based on the failure of the officer to establish the proper identity of the person making the acknowledgment shall have the burden of proof in establishing the negligence or misconduct of the officer.

(e) A person convicted of perjury under this section shall forfeit any financial interest in the document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 762, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 2566)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1188.

An officer taking the acknowledgment of an instrument shall endorse thereon or attach thereto a certificate pursuant to Section 1189.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 78, Sec. 1.   (AB 464)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1189.

(a) (1) Any certificate of acknowledgment taken within this state shall include a notice at the top of the certificate of acknowledgment in an enclosed box stating: “A notary public or other officer completing this certificate verifies only the identity of the individual who signed the document to which this certificate is attached, and not the truthfulness, accuracy, or validity
 of that document.” This notice shall be legible.

(2) The physical format of the boxed notice at the top of the certificate of acknowledgment required pursuant to paragraph (3) is an example, for purposes of illustration and not limitation, of the physical format of a boxed notice fulfilling the requirements of paragraph (1).

(3) A certificate of acknowledgment taken within this state shall be in the following form:

A notary public or other officer completing this 
certificate verifies only the identity of the
 individual who signed the document to which this
 certificate is attached, and not the
 truthfulness,
 accuracy, or validity of that document.State of California⎫County of⎭Onbefore me,(here insert name and title of the officer),personally appeared,who proved to me on the basis of 
satisfactory evidence to be the person(s) whose name(s) is/are
subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged to me that
he/she/they executed the same in his/her/their authorized
capacity(ies), and that by his/her/their signature(s) on the
instrument the person(s), or the entity upon behalf of which the
person(s) acted, executed the instrument.I certify under PENALTY OF PERJURY under the laws of the State of California that the
 foregoing paragraph is true and correct.WITNESS my hand and official seal.Signature(Seal)(4) A notary public who willfully states as true any material fact that he or she knows to be false shall be subject to a civil penalty
 not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000). An action to impose a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought by the Secretary of State in an administrative proceeding or any public prosecutor in superior court, and shall be enforced as a civil judgment. A public prosecutor shall inform the secretary of any civil penalty imposed under this section.

(b) Any certificate of acknowledgment taken in another place shall be sufficient in this state if it is taken in accordance with the laws of the place where the acknowledgment is made.

(c) On documents to be filed in another state or jurisdiction of the United States, a California notary public may complete any acknowledgment form as may be required in that other state or jurisdiction on a document, provided the form does not require the notary to determine or certify that the signer holds a particular representative capacity
 or to make other determinations and certifications not allowed by California law.

(d) An acknowledgment provided prior to January 1, 1993, and conforming to applicable provisions of former Sections 1189, 1190, 1190a, 1190.1, 1191, and 1192, as repealed by Chapter 335 of the Statutes of 1990, shall have the same force and effect as if those sections had not been repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   (SB 1050)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1190.

The certificate of acknowledgment of an instrument executed on behalf of an incorporated or unincorporated entity by a duly authorized person in the form specified in Section 1189 shall be prima facie evidence that the instrument is the duly authorized act of the entity named in the instrument and shall be conclusive evidence thereof in favor of any good faith purchaser, lessee, or encumbrancer. “Duly authorized person,” with respect to a domestic or foreign corporation, includes the president, vice president, secretary, and assistant secretary of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1070, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.

Officers taking and certifying acknowledgments or proof of instruments for record, must authenticate their certificates by affixing thereto their signatures, followed by the names of their offices; also, their seals of office, if by the laws of the State or country where the acknowledgment or proof is taken, or by authority of which they are acting, they are required to have official seals.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.

(a) Proof of the execution of an instrument, when not acknowledged, may be made by any of the following:

(1) By the party executing it, or either of them.

(2) By a subscribing witness.

(3) By other witnesses,
 in cases mentioned in Section 1198.

(b) (1) Proof of the execution of a power of attorney, grant deed, mortgage, deed of trust, quitclaim deed, security agreement, or any instrument affecting real property is not permitted pursuant to Section 27287 of the Government Code, though proof of the execution of a trustee’s deed or deed of reconveyance is permitted.

(2) Proof of the execution for any instrument requiring a notary public to obtain a thumbprint from the party signing the document in the notary public’s journal is not permitted.

(c) Any certificate for proof of execution taken within this state shall include a notice at the top of the certificate for proof of execution in an enclosed box stating: “A notary public or other officer completing this certificate verifies only the identity of
 the individual who signed the document to which this certificate is attached, and not the truthfulness, accuracy, or validity of that document.” This notice shall be legible.

(d) The physical format of the boxed notice at the top of the certificate for proof of execution required pursuant to subdivision (e) is an example, for purposes of illustration and not limitation, of the physical format of a boxed notice fulfilling the requirements of subdivision (c).

(e) A certificate for proof of execution taken within this state shall be in the following form:

A notary public or other
 officer completing this 
certificate verifies only the identity of the
 individual who signed the document to which this
 certificate is attached, and not the truthfulness,
accuracy, or validity of that document.State of California⎫ss.County of ⎭
On ____(date), before me, _____ (name and title of officer), personally appeared ____ (name of subscribing witness), proved to me to be the person whose name is subscribed to the within instrument, as a witness thereto, on the oath of ____ (name of credible witness), a credible witness who is known to me and provided a satisfactory identifying document. ____ (name of subscribing witness), being by me duly sworn, said that he/she was present and saw/heard ____(name[s] of
 principal[s]), the same person(s) described in and whose name(s) is/are subscribed to the within or attached instrument in his/her/their authorized capacity(ies) as (a) party(ies) thereto, execute or acknowledge executing the same, and that said affiant subscribed his/her name to the within or attached instrument as a witness at the request of ____(name[s] of principal[s]).WITNESS my hand and official seal.Signature (Seal)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.   (SB 1050)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.

A witness shall be proved to be a subscribing witness by the oath of a credible witness who provides the officer with any document satisfying the requirements of paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1185.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 67, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.

The subscribing witness must prove that the person whose name is subscribed to the instrument as a party is the person described in it, and that such person executed it, and that the witness subcribed his name thereto as a witness.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.

The execution of an instrument may be established by proof of the handwriting of the party and of a subscribing witness, if there is one, in the following cases:

1. When the parties and all the subscribing witnesses are dead; or,

2. When the parties and all the subscribing witnesses are non-residents of the State; or,

3. When the place of their residence is unknown to the party desiring the proof, and cannot be ascertained by the exercise of due diligence; or,

4. When the subscribing witness conceals himself, or cannot be found by the officer by the exercise of due diligence in attempting to serve the subpoena or attachment; or,

5. In case of the continued failure or refusal of the witness to testify, for the space of one hour, after his appearance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1199.]

Section Eleven Hundred and Ninety-nine. The evidence taken under the preceding section must satisfactorily prove to the officer the following facts: One—The existence of one or more of the conditions mentioned therein; and,

Two—That the witness testifying knew the person whose name purports to be subscribed to the instrument as a party, and is well acquainted with his signature, and that it is genuine; and,

Three—That the witness testifying personally knew the person who subscribed
 the instrument as a witness, and is well acquainted with his signature, and that it is genuine; and,

Four—The place of residence of the witness.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1200.

An officer taking proof of the execution of any instrument must, in his certificate indorsed thereon or attached thereto, set forth all the matters required by law to be done or known by him, or proved before him on the proceeding, together with the names of all the witnesses examined before him, their places of residence respectively, and the substance of their testimony.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

Officers authorized to take the proof of instruments are authorized in such proceedings:

1. To administer oaths or affirmations, as prescribed in Section 2093, Code of Civil Procedure;

2. To employ and swear interpreters;

3. To issue subpoena, as prescribed in Section 1986, Code of Civil Procedure;

4. To punish for contempt, as prescribed in Sections 1991, 1993, 1994, Code of Civil Procedure.

The civil damages and forfeiture to the party aggrieved are prescribed in Section 1992, Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

When the acknowledgment or proof of the execution of an instrument is properly made, but defectively certified, any party interested may have an action in the superior court to obtain a judgment correcting the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 445.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

Any person interested under an instrument entitled to be proved for record, may institute an action in the superior court against the proper parties to obtain a judgment proving such instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 445.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

A certified copy of the judgment in a proceeding instituted under either of the two preceding sections, showing the proof of the instrument, and attached thereto, entitles such instrument to record, with like effect as if acknowledged.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

The legality of the execution, acknowledgment, proof, form, or record of any conveyance or other instrument made before this Code goes into effect, executed, acknowledged, proved, or recorded is not affected by anything contained in this Chapter, but depends for its validity and legality upon the laws in force when the act was performed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

All conveyances of real property made before this Code goes into effect, and acknowledged or proved according to the laws in force at the time of such making and acknowledgment or proof, have the same force as evidence, and may be recorded in the same manner and with the like effect, as conveyances executed and acknowledged in pursuance of this Chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

Any instrument affecting the title to real property, 90 days after the same has been copied into the proper book of record, kept in the office of any county recorder, imparts notice of its contents to subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers, notwithstanding any defect, omission, or informality in the execution of the instrument, or in the certificate of acknowledgment thereof, or the absence of any such certificate; but nothing herein affects the rights of purchasers or encumbrancers previous to the taking effect of this act. Duly certified copies of the record of any such instrument may be read in evidence with like effect as copies of an instrument duly acknowledged and recorded; provided, when such copying in the proper book of
 record occurred within five years prior to the trial of the action, it is first shown that the original instrument was genuine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.   (AB 2004)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Effect of Recording, or the Want Thereof [1213. - 1220.]

1213.

Every conveyance of real property or an estate for years therein acknowledged or proved and certified and recorded as prescribed by law from the time it is filed with the recorder for record is constructive notice of the contents thereof to subsequent purchasers and mortgagees; and a certified copy of such a recorded conveyance may be recorded in any other county and when so recorded the record thereof shall have the same force and effect as though it was of the original conveyance and where the original conveyance has been recorded in any county wherein the property therein mentioned is not situated a certified copy of the recorded conveyance may be
 recorded in the county where such property is situated with the same force and effect as if the original conveyance had been recorded in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.

Every conveyance of real property or an estate for years therein, other than a lease for a term not exceeding one year, is void as against any subsequent purchaser or mortgagee of the same property, or any part thereof, in good faith and for a valuable consideration, whose conveyance is first duly recorded, and as against any judgment affecting the title, unless the conveyance shall have been duly recorded prior to the record of notice of action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 698, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.

The term “conveyance,” as used in Sections 1213 and 1214, embraces every instrument in writing by which any estate or interest in real property is created, aliened, mortgaged, or incumbered, or by which the title to any real property may be affected, except wills.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.

No power contained in an instrument to convey or execute instruments affecting real property which has been recorded is revoked by any act of the party by whom it was executed, unless the instrument containing such revocation is also acknowledged or proved, certified and recorded, in the same office in which the instrument containing the power was recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 323.)
-------------------------------------------

1217.

An unrecorded instrument is valid as between the parties thereto and those who have notice thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.

A certified copy of an instrument affecting the title to real property, once recorded, or a certified copy of the record of such instrument may be recorded in any other county, and, when so recorded, the record thereof has the same force and effect as though it was of the original instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1913, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.

Oil and gas leases may be acknowledged or proved, certified and recorded in like manner and with like effect, as grants of real property. However, an oil and gas lease may be recorded and constructive notice of the same and the contents of that lease given in the following manner:

Any person may record in the office of county recorder of any county fictitious oil and gas leases.
 Those fictitious oil and gas leases need not be acknowledged, or proved, or certified, to be recorded or entitled to record. Oil and gas leases shall have noted upon the face thereof that they are fictitious. The county recorder shall index and record fictitious oil and gas leases in the same manner as other oil and gas leases are recorded, and shall note on all indices and records of the same that they are fictitious. Thereafter, any of the provisions of any recorded fictitious oil and gas lease may be included for any and all purposes in any oil and gas lease by reference therein to those provisions, without setting the same forth in full, if the fictitious oil and gas lease is of record in the county in which the oil and gas lease adopting or including by reference any of the provisions of the lease is recorded. The reference shall contain a statement, as to each county in which the oil and gas lease containing such a reference is recorded, of the date the fictitious oil and gas lease was recorded, the
 county recorder’s office in which it is recorded, and the book or volume and the first page of the records or the recorder’s instrument number in the recorder’s office in which the fictitious oil and gas lease was recorded, and a statement by paragraph numbers or any other method that will definitely identify the same, of the specific provisions of any fictitious oil and gas lease that are being adopted and included therein. The recording of any oil and gas lease which has included any provisions by reference shall operate as constructive notice of the whole including the terms, as a part of the written contents of any oil and gas lease, of any provisions so included by reference as though the same were written in full therein. The parties bound or to be bound by provisions so adopted and included by reference shall be bound thereby in the same manner and with like effect for all purposes as though the provisions had been and were set forth in full in the oil and gas lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 54, Sec. 4.   (SB 544)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1220.

Contracts for the purchase or sale of standing timber or trees, for severance or otherwise, and all instruments in writing by which any estate or interest in, or right to cut, standing timber or trees is created, aliened, mortgaged or encumbered or by which the title to any standing timber or trees may be affected, may be acknowledged or proved, certified and recorded in like manner and with like effect, as grants of real property, and all statutory provisions relating to the recordation or nonrecordation of conveyances of real property and to the effect thereof shall apply to such contracts and instruments with like effect.

Any such contracts for purchase and sale or instruments in writing affecting the title to standing timber or trees, executed and delivered before the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1959 Regular Session of the Legislature but unrecorded before such date, shall become subject to all statutory provisions relating to the recordation or nonrecordation of conveyances of real property and to the effect thereof one year from said effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1795.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Unlawful Transfers [1227. - 1231.]

1227.

Every instrument, other than a will, affecting an estate in real property, including every charge upon real property, or upon its rents or profits, made with intent to defraud prior or subsequent purchasers thereof, or incumbrancers thereon, is void as against every purchaser or incumbrancer, for value, of the same property, or the rents or profits thereof.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1228.

No instrument is to be avoided under the last section, in favor of a subsequent purchaser or incumbrancer having notice thereof at the time his purchase was made, or his lien acquired, unless the person in whose favor the instrument was made was privy to the fraud intended.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1229.

Where a power to revoke or modify an instrument affecting the title to, or the enjoyment of, an estate in real property, is reserved to the grantor, or given to any other person, a subsequent grant of, or charge upon, the estate, by the person having the power or revocation, in favor of a purchaser or incumbrancer for value, operates as a revocation of the original instrument, to the extent of the power, in favor of such purchaser or incumbrancer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1230.

Where a person having a power of revocation, within the provisions of the last section, is not entitled to execute it until after the time at which he makes such a grant or charge as is described in that section, the power is deemed to be executed as soon as he is entitled to execute it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1231.

Other provisions concerning unlawful transfers are contained in Part II, Division Fourth, of this Code, concerning the Special Relations of Debtor and Creditor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 8. WATER RIGHTS [1414. - 1422.]

1414.

As between appropriators, the one first in time is the first in right.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1415.

A person desiring to appropriate water must post a notice, in writing, in a conspicuous place at the point of intended diversion, stating therein:

1. That he claims the water there flowing to the extent of (giving the number) inches, measured under a four-inch pressure;

2. The purposes for which he claims it, and the place of intended use;

3. The means by which he intends to divert it, and the size of the flume, ditch, pipe, or aqueduct in which he intends to divert it.

A copy of the notice must, within ten days after it is posted, be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which it is posted. After filing such copy for record, the place of intended diversion or the place of intended use or the means by which it is intended to divert the water, may be changed by the person posting said notice or his assigns, if others are not injured by such change. This provision applies to notices already filed as well as to notices hereafter filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1903, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

1416.

Within sixty days after the notice is posted, the claimant must commence the excavation or construction of the works in which he intends to divert the water, or the survey, road or trail building, necessarily incident thereto, and must prosecute the work diligently and uninterruptedly to completion, unless temporarily interrupted by snows or rain; provided, that if the erection of a dam has been recommended by the California dGbris commission at or near the place where it is intended to divert the water, the claimant shall have sixty days after the completion of such dam in which to commence the excavation or construction of the works
 in which he intends to divert the water; provided, that whenever any city and county, or any incorporated city or town within this state makes, or has made, or acquires, or has acquired any appropriation of any of the waters of this state in accordance with the provisions of section 1415 of this code, it shall not be necessary for such city and county, city or town to commence the work for development of more of the water so claimed than is actually necessary for the immediate needs of such city and county, city or town and it shall be held to be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of this chapter, to the full amount of water stated in the notice posted and recorded, for such city and county, city or town to within sixty days make the necessary surveys, or within six months to authorize the issuance of municipal bonds, for the construction of the necessary works designed to supply such city and county, city or town with the water required for immediate use. Any appropriation heretofore made
 by any such city and county, city or town in connection with which surveys were at any time made, or an issue of bonds authorized for the construction of any portion of the works necessary for a diversion of any part of the water appropriated, is hereby confirmed to the full amount of water stated in the original notice or notices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1911, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

1417.

By “completion” is meant conducting the waters to the place of intended use.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1418.

By a compliance with the above rules the claimant’s right to the use of the water relates back to the time the notice was posted.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1419.

A failure to comply with such rules deprives the claimants of the right to the use of the water as against a subsequent claimant who complies therewith.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1420.

Persons who have heretofore claimed the right to water, and who have not constructed works in which to divert it, and who have not diverted nor applied it to some useful purpose, must, after this Title takes effect, and within twenty days thereafter, proceed as in this Title provided, or their right ceases.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1421.

The Recorder of each county must keep a book, in which he must record the notices provided for in this Title.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1422.

If the place of intended diversion or any part of the route of intended conveyance of water so claimed, be within, and a part of, any national park, forest reservation, or other public reservation, and be so shown in the notice of appropriation of said water, then the claimant shall have sixty days, after the grant of authority to occupy and use such park or reservation for such intended purpose, within which to commence the excavation or construction of said works; provided that within sixty days after the posting of said notice of appropriation, as provided in section 1415 of the Civil Code, the claimant shall in good faith commence (and thereafter diligently and
 continuously, except when temporarily interrupted by snow or rain, prosecute to completion) such surveys and other work as under the regulations governing such park or reservations, may be required as preliminary to, or for use with, an application for such authority; and provided also that the claimant shall in good faith on completion of said survey and preliminary work, apply to the officer, board, or body, having charge of such park or reservation, for such authority, and shall thereafter, prosecute said application with reasonable diligence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1903, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. OBLIGATIONS [1427. - 3273.91.]



PART 1. OBLIGATIONS IN GENERAL [1427. - 1543.]



  TITLE 1. DEFINITION OF OBLIGATIONS [1427. - [1428.]]

1427.

An obligation is a legal duty, by which a person is bound to do or not to do a certain thing.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1428.]

Section Fourteen Hundred and Twenty-eight. An obligation arises either from:One—The contract of the parties; or,

Two—The operation of law. An obligation arising from operation of law may be enforced in the manner provided by law, or by civil action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. INTERPRETATION OF OBLIGATIONS [1429. - 1451.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Rules of Interpretation [1429. - 1429.]

1429.

The rules which govern the interpretation of contracts are prescribed by Part II of this Division. Other obligations are interpreted by the same rules by which statutes of a similar nature are interpreted.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Joint or Several Obligations [1430. - 1432.]

1430.

An obligation imposed upon several persons, or a right created in favor of several persons, may be:

1. Joint;

2. Several; or,

3. Joint and several.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.

Joint Liability

An obligation imposed upon several persons, or a right created in favor of several persons, is presumed to be joint, and not several, except as provided in Section 1431.2, and except in the special cases mentioned in the title on the interpretation of contracts. This presumption, in the case of a right, can be overcome only by express words to the contrary.

(History: Amended June 3, 1986, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 2.   Note: Prop. 51 (the Fair Responsibility Act of 1986) includes Sections 1431.1 to 1431.5 and part of this section.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.1.

Findings and Declaration of Purpose

The People of the State of California find and declare as follows:

a) The legal doctrine of joint and several liability, also known as “the deep pocket rule”, has resulted in a system of inequity and injustice that has threatened financial bankruptcy of local governments, other public agencies, private individuals and businesses and
has resulted in higher prices for goods and services to the public and in higher taxes to the taxpayers.

b) Some governmental and private defendants are perceived to have substantial financial resources or insurance coverage and have thus been included in lawsuits even though there was little or no basis for finding them at fault. Under joint and several liability, if they are found to share even a fraction of the fault, they often are held financially liable for all the damage. The People—taxpayers and consumers alike—ultimately pay for these lawsuits in the form of higher taxes, higher prices and higher insurance premiums.

c) Local governments have been forced to curtail some essential police, fire and other protections because of the soaring costs of lawsuits and insurance premiums.

Therefore, the People of the State of California
declare that to remedy these inequities, defendants in tort actions shall be held financially liable in closer proportion to their degree of fault. To treat them differently is unfair and inequitable.

The People of the State of California further declare that reforms in the liability laws in tort actions are necessary and proper to avoid catastrophic economic consequences for state and local governmental bodies as well as private individuals and businesses.

(History: Added June 3, 1986, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 3.   Note: Prop. 51 (the Fair Responsibility Act of 1986) includes Sections 1431.1 to 1431.5 and part of Section 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.2.

Several Liability for Non-economic Damages

(a) In any action for personal injury, property damage, or wrongful death, based upon principles of comparative fault, the liability of each defendant for non-economic damages shall be several only and shall not be joint. Each defendant shall be liable only for the amount of non-economic damages allocated to that defendant in direct proportion to that defendant’s
percentage of fault, and a separate judgment shall be rendered against that defendant for that amount.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, the term “economic damages” means objectively verifiable monetary losses including medical expenses, loss of earnings, burial costs, loss of use of property, costs of repair or replacement, costs of obtaining substitute domestic services, loss of employment and loss of business or employment opportunities.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the term “non-economic damages” means subjective, non-monetary losses including, but not limited to, pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental suffering, emotional distress, loss of society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation and humiliation.

(History: Added June 3, 1986, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 4.   Note: Prop. 51 (the Fair Responsibility Act of 1986) includes Sections 1431.1 to 1431.5 and part of Section 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.3.

Nothing contained in this measure is intended, in any way, to alter the law of immunity.

(History: Added June 3, 1986, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 5.   Note: In the text, "this measure" refers to Prop. 51 (the Fair Responsibility Act of 1986), which includes Sections 1431.1 to 1431.5 and part of Section 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.4.

Amendment or Repeal of Measure.

This measure may be amended or repealed by either of the procedures set forth in this section. If any portion of subsection (a) is declared invalid, then subsection (b) shall be the exclusive means of amending or repealing this measure. 

(a) This measure may be amended to further its purposes by statute, passed in each house by rollcall
vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring and signed by the Governor, if at least 20 days prior to passage in each house the bill in its final form has been delivered to the Secretary of State for distribution to the news media.

(b) This measure may be amended or repealed by a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the electors.

(History: Added June 3, 1986, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 6.   Note: In the text, "this measure" refers to Prop. 51 (the Fair Responsibility Act of 1986), which includes Sections 1431.1 to 1431.5 and part of Section 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.5.

Severability.

If any provision of this measure, or the application of any such provision to any person or circumstances, shall be held invalid, the remainder of this measure to the extent it can be given effect, or the application of such provision to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby, and to this end the provisions of this measure are
severable.

(History: Added June 3, 1986, by initiative Proposition 51, Sec. 7.   Note: In the text, "this measure" refers to Prop. 51 (the Fair Responsibility Act of 1986), which includes Sections 1431.1 to 1431.5 and part of Section 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

1432.

Except as provided in Section 877 of the Code of Civil Procedure, a party to a joint, or joint and several obligation, who satisfies more than his share of the claim against all, may require a proportionate contribution from all the parties joined with him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Conditional Obligations [1434. - 1442.]

1434.

An obligation is conditional, when the rights or duties of any party thereto depend upon the occurrence of an uncertain event.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1435.

Conditions may be precedent, concurrent, or subsequent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1436.

A condition precedent is one which is to be performed before some right dependent thereon accrues, or some act dependent thereon is performed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1437.

Conditions concurrent are those which are mutually dependent, and are to be performed at the same time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1438.
